apertium-es-gl.es.dix
<pardef n="emp/ezar__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>ezaríamos</l> <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaría</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaríais</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezarías</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezarían</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaría</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaremos</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaré</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaréis</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezarás</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezarán</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezará</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezáremos</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezare</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezareis</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezares</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaren</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezare</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezando</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezándo</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabiéndo"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezamos</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ecé</l>       <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezasteis</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaste</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaron</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezó</l>       <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezad</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eza</l>       <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><p><l>os</l><r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezad</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabed"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezá</l>       <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabé"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezád</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabéd"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieza</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéza</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezar</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezar</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__saber"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezár</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sabér"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezábamos</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaba</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezabais</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezabas</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaban</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaba</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezáramos</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezásemos</l>  <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezara</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezase</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezarais</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezaseis</l>   <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaras</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezases</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezaran</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezasen</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezara</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ezase</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezadas</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezada</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezados</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezado</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezamos</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iezo</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ezáis</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iezas</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iezan</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieza</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ecemos</l>    <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iece</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ecéis</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ieces</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iecen</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iece</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iécen</l>     <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iéce</l>      <r>ezar<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sábe"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="empezar"><i>emp</i><par n="emp/ezar__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="tropezar"><i>trop</i><par n="emp/ezar__vblex"/></e>
